South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) A statewide advisory referendum must be conducted by the State Election Commission at the same time as the 2026 General Election on the question of whether South Carolina should participate in Medicaid expansion so that beginning January 1, 2028, an adult sixty-five years of age and younger whose income is at or below one hundred thirty three percent of the federal poverty level, with a five percent income disregard, is eligible for Medicaid as provided for in the "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act" (P.L. No. 111 148), and amendments to that act. The state election laws shall apply to the referendum, with the appropriate changes being made.  The State Board of Canvassers shall publish the results of the referendum and certify them to the Governor and each house of the General Assembly. (B)  Ballots must be provided to all qualified electors participating in the referendum with the following question printed on the ballot: "Do you favor the State of South Carolina to participate in Medicaid expansion so that beginning January 1, 2028, an adult sixty five years of age and younger whose income is at or below one hundred thirty three percent of the federal poverty level, with a five percent income disregard, is eligible for Medicaid as provided for in the 'Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act' (P.L. No. 111 148), and amendments to that act? Yes p No   p Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes,' and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." (C)  The cost of the referendum must be paid from funds appropriated to the State Election Commission and the results of the referendum are advisory only. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----